Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 5. Off-Street Parking and Business District Renewal.

§ 43-35-201.
Municipal parking facilities; delegation of power, duties, and responsibilities.

The governing authorities of any municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) population or more, and the governing authorities of any municipality of twenty-five thousand (25,000) population or more located in any county adjacent to a county in which a municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more is located, and the governing authorities of any municipality having a population of more than eleven thousand (11,000) but less than eleven thousand two hundred (11,200) according to the 1980 decennial census located in any county adjacent to a county having a municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, and the governing authorities of any municipality in any county having a population in excess of one hundred thirty thousand (130,000) according to the 1970 decennial census, and the governing authorities of any municipality in any county having a population in excess of twenty-seven thousand (27,000) according to the 1970 decennial census and bordering on the State of Tennessee wherein United States Highways 45 and 72 intersect, and the governing authorities of any municipality in any county having a population in excess of thirty-eight thousand (38,000) according to the 1980 decennial census and bordering on the Mississippi River wherein United States Highways 61 and 84 intersect shall have, and may, within their discretion, by resolution duly adopted, delegate to its urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority created pursuant to Section 43-35-33, any or all of the following additional powers, duties and responsibilities, as specified in the resolution of the governing authorities of the municipality.

The power and authority to establish and construct municipal parking facilities for motor vehicles belonging to members of the general public, and to rent, lease, purchase or acquire by the power of eminent domain, in any manner now authorized by law for the acquisition of land and property for public purposes, the necessary lands and property for the establishment and construction of such parking facilities and related structures; the power and authority to prescribe rules, regulations and rates for the use and operation of such parking facility; to employ, fix and pay the compensation of necessary operating personnel; to rent, sell, convey, transfer, let or lease said facility and related structures or any portion thereof, or any space therein, on such terms and conditions as shall be reasonable; to lease or sell air rights over and adjacent to such facilities. Commercial enterprise activities other than parking of motor vehicles may be authorized on leased property comprising any part of such parking facilities and related structures, but only upon an express finding, by resolution of the governing authorities of the municipality as hereinafter provided, that such commercial enterprise activities are essential to the economic feasibility of the proposed parking facilities. Before proceeding to exercise or delegate the powers and authority provided in this paragraph (a), the governing authorities of such municipality shall adopt and publish an ordinance and conduct the hearing as provided in Section 21-37-25 and any citizens may appeal as therein provided.

To plan, establish, construct, build, maintain and operate inland ports, and to this end to negotiate, receive, contract for and expend funds from any source, including but not limited to, city, county, state and federal funds and private donations.

To cooperate with and act jointly with other political subdivisions and agencies of the State of Mississippi and other commissions, departments and instrumentalities of the municipality, and with the federal government and agencies thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-201; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 399, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 430, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1988).

§ 43-35-202.
Special parking facility taxing districts.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, and the governing authorities of any municipality having a population of more than eleven thousand (11,000) but less than eleven thousand two hundred (11,200) according to the 1980 decennial census located in any county adjacent to a county having a municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, which have elected, or hereafter may elect, to exercise or delegate the power and authority to establish and construct municipal parking facilities for motor vehicles belonging to members of the general public, as provided in Section 43-35-201, are hereby authorized and empowered to establish one or more special parking facility taxing districts and to levy, collect and make an annual special tax not to exceed six (6) mills against all property in each such special parking facility taxing district, provided that such special taxes shall not be levied, collected or made unless the governing authorities shall have adopted a resolution (i) designating an area a special parking facility taxing district; (ii) specifying the maximum millage to be levied on property in such area pursuant to this subsection; and (iii) if such area shall not be within one (1) or more urban renewal areas as defined in Article 1, Chapter 35, Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972, declaring such area to be a slum area or a blighted area or a combination thereof within the meaning of Article 1, Chapter 35, Title 43, Mississippi Code of 1972. Such special tax levy shall be excluded from the limitations imposed under Section 27-39-321. Prior to adopting such resolution, the governing authorities shall hold a public hearing with respect thereto after public notice by publication at least twice, once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks, with the first publication being not less than fourteen (14) calendar days prior to the date specified for such hearing, such notice to include the date, time and place of such hearing, the proposed boundaries of such special parking facility taxing district and the maximum special tax to be levied on property in such district pursuant to this subsection. The boundaries of such special parking facility taxing district shall not be modified and special taxes shall not be levied in excess of the maximum set forth in such resolution, unless the governing authorities shall have amended such resolution after a public hearing and notice as described above. The proceeds of any special tax levied on property in a special parking facility taxing district pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be used solely to pay principal of and interest on bonds issued by such municipality under Section 43-35-203 with respect to parking facilities located within such special parking facility taxing district or shall be paid to the urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to which the power and authority to establish to construct municipal parking facilities shall have been delegated and used by such urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to pay principal of and interest on bonds issued by such urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority under Section 43-35-203 with respect to parking facilities located within such special parking facility taxing district. The governing authorities of such municipality shall levy such tax at the maximum rate specified in such resolution against all property in such special parking facility taxing district for so long as any bonds issued pursuant to Section 43-35-203 with respect to parking facilities located within such special parking facility taxing district shall be outstanding unless the governing body of the urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority shall certify that a lesser rate will provide revenues sufficient to pay debt service on all bonds payable from such tax and to pay costs of owning, operating and managing parking facilities located in such special parking facility taxing district, in which event such governing authorities shall levy such tax at such lesser rate. The governing authorities of a municipality may also enter into agreements for the benefit of holders of bonds issued by an urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority pursuant to Section 43-35-203 limiting or restricting issuance of bonds by such municipality which would be payable from such special tax to the extent that such governing authorities shall determine that such agreements are necessary or desirable in connection with the issuance of bonds by an urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority pursuant to Section 43-35-203. Such tax shall cease to be levied after all principal of and interest on bonds issued under Section 43-35-203 with respect to parking facilities located within such special parking facility taxing district shall have been paid in full.

The governing authorities of any municipality having a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, and the governing authorities of any municipality having a population of more than eleven thousand (11,000) but less than eleven thousand two hundred (11,200) according to the 1980 decennial census located in any county adjacent to a county having a municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, which have elected, or hereafter may elect, to exercise or delegate the power and authority to establish and construct municipal parking facilities for motor vehicles belonging to members of the general public, as provided in Section 43-35-201, are hereby authorized to adopt and carry out one or more parking facility tax increment financing plans and to enter into agreements, which may extend over any period of time, any other rule of law to the contrary notwithstanding, with any urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to which such power and authority shall have been delegated to pay to such urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority an amount equal to the parking facility tax increment financing revenues received by such municipality and allocated to parking facilities pursuant to such parking facility tax increment financing plan. Such agreements may also include such reasonable provisions as the governing body shall determine to be appropriate to provide security for the holders of bonds issued or to be issued by such urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority which are payable in whole or in part from payments pursuant to such agreements.

In the event that a municipality or urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority shall have entered into an agreement with a private person, firm or partnership under which such private person, firm or partnership shall have agreed to construct specific buildings or other facilities or improvements, to pay all real property taxes due on such buildings or other facilities or improvements in a timely manner and to maintain and operate such buildings or other facilities or improvements in such a manner as to preserve property values, such agreement may specify a minimum payment to be made by such municipality based on the governing body’s determination of the expected ad valorem taxes to be received from such buildings or other facilities or improvements, in which event such municipality shall be unconditionally obligated to make such payments from its general fund or other available funds, regardless of whether actual ad valorem taxes shall have been less than such amount.

The governing authorities of any county in which a municipality is located which has adopted, or hereafter may adopt, a parking facility tax increment financing plan as provided in this Section 43-35-202, are hereby authorized to become a party to such parking facility tax increment financing plan and enter into agreements, which may extend over any period of time notwithstanding any rule of law to the contrary, to pay to such municipality, or any urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to which power and authority to establish and construct municipal parking facilities for motor vehicles belonging to members of the general public shall have been delegated, an amount equal to the parking facility tax increment financing revenues received by such county and allocated to parking facilities pursuant to such tax increment financing plan. Such agreements may also include such reasonable provisions as the governing body shall determine to be appropriate to provide security for the holders of bonds issued or to be issued by such urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority which are payable in whole or in part from payments pursuant to such agreements.

In the event that a county, municipality or urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority shall have entered into an agreement with a private person, firm or partnership under which such private person, firm or partnership shall have agreed to construct specific buildings or other facilities or improvements, to pay all real property taxes due on such buildings or other facilities or improvements in a timely manner and to maintain and operate such buildings or other facilities or improvements in such a manner as to preserve property values, such agreement may specify a minimum payment to be made by such county based on the governing body’s determination of the expected ad valorem taxes to be received from such buildings or other facilities or improvements, in which event such county shall be unconditionally obligated to make such payments from its general fund or other available sources regardless of whether actual ad valorem taxes shall have been less than such amount.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 465, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 430, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 23, 1988).

§ 43-35-203.
Revenue bonds; form; maturity; execution; interest.

The governing authorities of any municipality which has elected, or hereafter may elect, to exercise or delegate the power and authority to establish and construct municipal parking facilities for motor vehicles belonging to the general public, as provided in Section 43-35-201, and the governing authorities of any urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to which such power and authority shall have been delegated are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to issue bonds for the purpose of acquiring land and property for a municipal parking facility and related structures and also for owning, erecting, building, establishing, operating and maintaining such facilities and related structures and to remodel or repair the same, and to refund outstanding bonds and to pay costs relating to the issuance of such bonds and interest on such bonds and to establish any reserves determined to be appropriate. Such bonds may be issued without an election thereon upon the adoption of a resolution by the governing authorities of such issuing authority. Such bonds shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount, and shall not be included in computing the statutory limitation of indebtedness of such issuing authority under any present or future law. Such bonds shall bear date or dates, shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall bear interest at such rates not to exceed the maximum rate specified in Section 75-17-103, shall be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature at such time or times and upon such terms and may be made redeemable prior to maturity with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges and shall be in substantially such form as shall be determined by resolution of the governing authorities of such issuing authority.

Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the mayor or chairman and clerk or secretary of such issuing authority, with the seal of the issuing authority affixed thereto or reproduced thereon. Whenever such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the same who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the date of the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-202; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 465, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-35-205.
Revenue bonds; sale.

The governing authorities of such municipality shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at not less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser and in the manner provided in Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-203; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-207.
Revenue bonds; negotiability; tax exemption.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this article shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi, except inheritance taxes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-204; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-209.
Disposition of proceeds; additional bonds to provide for deficit; disposition of surplus.

The principal proceeds of such bonds shall be paid into a special fund in a bank or banks qualified as depositories for the municipality or for the urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to which the municipality has delegated its power and authority with respect to such parking facilities. The accrued interest and premium, if any, shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. The principal proceeds shall be used solely for the purposes for which such bonds were issued, except as hereinafter provided, and shall be disbursed upon order of the board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority having jurisdiction of said parking facilities, or upon order of the governing authorities of such municipality, as the case may be. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project for which such bonds were issued and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, then and in such event, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner, be issued to provide the amount of such deficit. Unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, such additional bonds shall be deemed to be of the same issue as the original bonds and shall be entitled to payment from the same funds without preference or priority to the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the project for which the bonds were issued, such surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-205; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-211.
Bonds payable out of net revenues; payments in lieu of taxes.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall be payable, both principal and interest, solely out of such (i) special taxes levied pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 43-35-202, (ii) parking facility tax increment financing revenues as provided in subsection (2) of Section 43-35-202, (iii) payments to be made to any redevelopment authority or urban renewal agency or municipality authorized pursuant to subsections (1), (2) or (3) of Section 43-35-202, or (iv) net revenues to accrue from the operation of the parking facilities and related structures for which such bonds were issued or any combination thereof, as shall be specified in the resolution authorizing issuance of such bonds, and the full faith and credit of the issuing authority shall not be pledged therefor, and such fact shall be recited on the face of each bond. “Revenues” as used herein with respect to parking facilities shall mean all charges, rentals, tolls, rents, gifts, grants, contributions, and all other funds accruing from the operation, lease, or sale of parking facilities and related structures; “net revenues” as used herein, shall mean the revenues remaining after payment of costs and expenses of operation and maintenance of the parking facilities and related structures. The commissioners of an urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority may, in their discretion, make payments to the municipality and county within which such parking facilities are located, in lieu of taxes, and such payments may be deducted in determining net revenues to the extent permitted in the resolution under which such bonds are issued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-206; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 6; Laws, 1985, ch. 465, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-35-213.
Covenants affecting security of bonds; bondholders’ lien.

A resolution issuing bonds in compliance with this article may include any covenants with the bondholders deemed necessary to make such bonds secure and marketable, including, but without limitation, covenants regarding the application of the bond proceeds; the pledging, application and securing of special taxes, parking facility tax increment financing revenues, payments from municipalities and counties, other revenues and the revenues of the parking facilities; the creation and maintenance of reserves; covenants to levy special taxes and other taxes; covenants to enforce agreements; the investment of funds; the issuance of additional bonds; the maintenance of minimum fees, charges and rentals; the operation and maintenance of facilities; insurance and insurance proceeds; accounts and audits; the sale of properties; remedies of bondholders; the vesting in a trustee or trustees such powers and rights as may be necessary to secure the bonds and the revenues and funds from which they are payable; the terms and conditions upon which bondholders may exercise their rights and remedies; the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds; the definition, consequences and remedies of an event of default; and the appointment of a receiver in the event of a default.

All taxes and revenues pledged to the payment of such bonds shall be subject to a lien in favor of the holders of such bonds, and all such taxes and revenues received by the issuing authority shall be immediately subject to such lien without any physical delivery thereof or further act by the issuing authority, and such lien shall be effective as against all parties asserting claims against the issuing authority, whether by way of tort, contract or otherwise, whether or not such parties may have had notice of such lien. Such pledge or trust agreement creating the same need not be filed or recorded except in the official minutes of the issuing authority.

The state does hereby covenant with the holders of any such bonds that it will not, while any such bonds shall be outstanding, limit or diminish the right and power of any county, municipality or urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority to establish, maintain and collect rates, fees, rentals and other charges pledged to the payment of such bonds, or to levy the special taxes authorized by this article, to fulfill any covenants with or for the benefit of such bondholders, or to make or receive payments pursuant to a parking facility tax increment financing plan.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-207; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 7; Laws, 1985, ch. 465, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 43-35-215.
Trust agreements.

In the discretion of the issuing authority, all bonds may be further secured by a trust agreement between the issuing authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law. The trust agreement may contain provisions for the issuance of additional bonds under the procedures established by this article for any of the purposes authorized by this law which shall be secured by the revenues pledged thereunder for such bonds to the extent provided therein.

The trust agreement may include provisions to the effect that, if there is any default in the payment of principal or interest on any of said bonds, any court of competent jurisdiction may appoint a receiver to administer the properties and facilities of the authority described in the trust agreement on behalf of the municipality or urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority, including authority to sell or make contracts for the sale of any services, facilities or commodities of the authority or to renew such contracts, subject to the approval of the court appointing the said receiver; and with power to provide for the payment of such bonds outstanding, or the payment of operating expenses, and to apply the income and revenues to the payment of the said bonds and interest thereon in accordance with the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of such bonds and the said trust agreement. The fee for the services of any corporate trustee shall not exceed the normal charges for acting as paying agent, plus any additional amount or amounts allowed by the court as the reasonable value of services rendered by the corporate trustee.

The powers herein granted may be exercised whether or not a trust agreement is entered into and, if no trust agreement is entered into, such provisions as are above authorized may be set out in the resolution authorizing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-208; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-217.
Validation of bonds.

Bonds authorized and issued hereunder shall be submitted to validation in the chancery court of the county in which such parking facilities are located, in the manner and with the same force and effect as now or hereafter provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-209; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-219.
Attorney’s fees.

Prior to the authorization, issuance, and subsequent validation of bonds issued under this article, the issuing authority shall have secured the legal services of a competent practicing attorney or firm of attorneys. However, in no instance shall the attorney’s fees paid for the issuance or refunding of such bonds exceed the following amounts, to-wit:

On all such bond issues the attorney’s fees shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the first one million dollars ($1,000,000.00); one-half percent (1/2%) of all over one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) and not more than two million dollars ($2,000,000.00); and one-fourth percent (1/4%) of all amounts in excess of two million dollars ($2,000,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-210; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§§ 43-35-221 through 43-35-229.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 1980, ch. 441, § 5, eff from and after its passage (approved May 1, 1980).

§43-35-221. [Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 11]

§43-35-223. [Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 12]

§43-35-225. [Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 13]

§43-35-227. [Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 14]

§43-35-229. [Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 15]

§ 43-35-231.
Authority conferred by article cumulative.

The authority and power conferred upon the municipalities by this article shall be cumulative and in addition to any other authorities and powers conferred upon them by law and shall not be construed to in any way diminish or limit any other such authorities or powers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-216; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-233.
Authority for issuance of bonds.

Bonds may be issued pursuant to this article without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those specified or required by this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-217; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-235.
Appointment of additional members to board of urban renewal agency.

The governing authorities of any municipality which has delegated to its urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority the powers, duties and responsibilities relating to parking facilities as provided for in Section 43-35-201, may, within their discretion, appoint two (2) additional members to the board of commissioners of such urban renewal agency, in addition to the five (5) members provided for in Section 43-35-33. Such additional commissioners shall be appointed in the same manner and for the same term, and shall have the same qualifications and shall otherwise be subject to the provisions of Section 43-35-33 and Section 43-35-35.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-218; Laws, 1970, ch. 499, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 43-35-237.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article the following terms shall have the meanings given in this section unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:

“Base year value” shall mean the appraised value of a property used in assessing ad valorem taxes for the year in which a parking facility tax increment financing plan covering such property shall have been adopted or, if later, the year in which such property was included in a parking facility tax increment financing plan; provided that, if any property shall have been exempt from ad valorem taxation for the year in which a parking facility tax increment financing plan shall have been adopted or, if later, the year in which such property was included in a parking facility tax increment financing plan, and shall thereafter become subject to ad valorem taxation, the base year value shall be the appraised value of such property used in assessing taxes during the first year that such property shall be subject to ad valorem taxation or, if lesser, the appraised value, as certified by the applicable tax assessor, which would have been used in assessing taxes during the preceding year if the property had been subject to ad valorem taxation.

“Issuing authority” means any city or town incorporated under the laws of the State of Mississippi or any urban renewal agency or redevelopment authority within such city or town having authority to issue bonds pursuant to Section 43-35-203.

“Municipality” means any city or town incorporated under the laws of the State of Mississippi.

“Parking facility tax increment financing plan” means a plan for allocating all or a part of any increases in general fund ad valorem taxes arising as a result of increases in the value of specific properties or properties in designated areas (or any combination thereof) to defray costs relating to parking facilities. Such plan shall be sufficiently complete to indicate the anticipated increases in general fund ad valorem taxes, the percentage or dollar amount of such taxes to be allocated to defray costs relating to parking facilities and the specific properties or specific area (or combination) covered by such plan.

“Parking facility tax increment financing revenues” means the increases in general fund ad valorem taxes received as a result of increases in the values of specific properties or properties located in a designated area. Such increases, with respect to specific properties during a year, shall be the amount by which general fund ad valorem taxes received during such year as a result of levies on such property exceed the general fund ad valorem taxes which would have been received if such property were assessed based on its base year value. Such increases, with respect to properties located in specific areas during a year, shall be the amount by which general fund ad valorem taxes received during such year as a result of levies on all nonexempt properties in such area exceed the general fund ad valorem taxes which would have been received if such nonexempt properties were assessed based on the base year value of each such property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 45, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1985.